Maine, session 132, LD2120.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA c. 262 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 262
SAFE VEHICLE ACCESS FOR SURVIVORS ACT
§2261. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Safe Vehicle Access for Survivors Act.''
§2262. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Abuser. ''Abuser'' means an individual identified by a survivor pursuant to section
2264 who has committed or allegedly committed a covered act against a survivor making
a connected vehicle service request.
2. Account holder. ''Account holder'' means an individual who is:
A. A party to a contract with a covered provider that involves a connected vehicle
service; or
B. A subscriber, customer or registered user of a connected vehicle service.
3. Affiliate. ''Affiliate'' means a company that controls, is controlled by or is under
common control with another company.
4. Connected vehicle service. ''Connected vehicle service'' means a capability
provided by or on behalf of a motor vehicle manufacturer or affiliate of the motor vehicle
manufacturer that enables a person to remotely obtain data from or send commands to a
covered vehicle and that may be accomplished through a software application that is
designed to be operated on a mobile device or computer.
5. Connected vehicle service request. ''Connected vehicle service request'' means a
request by a survivor to terminate or disable an abuser's access to a connected vehicle
service.
6. Covered act. ''Covered act'' means conduct that constitutes:
A. A crime described in Section 40002(a) of the federal Violence Against Women Act
of 1994, 34 United States Code, Section 12291(a), including domestic violence, dating
violence, sexual assault, stalking and sex trafficking;
B. An act or practice described in the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of
2000, 22 United States Code, Section 7102, Subsection (11) or (12), relating to severe
forms of trafficking in persons and sex trafficking, respectively; or
C. An act under state law, tribal law or the United States Uniform Code of Military
Justice that is similar to an offense described in paragraph A or B.
A criminal conviction or any other determination of a court is not required in order for
conduct under this subsection to constitute a covered act.
Page 1 - 132LR2724(01)

7. Covered connected vehicle services account. ''Covered connected vehicle services
account'' means an account or other means by which an individual enrolls in or obtains
access to a connected vehicle service.
8. Covered provider. ''Covered provider'' means a motor vehicle manufacturer, an
affiliate of the motor vehicle manufacturer or an entity acting on behalf of the motor vehicle
manufacturer that provides a connected vehicle service.
9. Covered vehicle. ''Covered vehicle'' means a motor vehicle that is the subject of a
connected vehicle service request and identified by a survivor pursuant to section 2264.
10. Emergency situation. ''Emergency situation'' means a situation that, if allowed to
continue, poses an imminent threat of serious bodily harm to or death of an individual.
11. In-vehicle interface. ''In-vehicle interface'' means a feature or mechanism installed
in a vehicle that allows an individual within the vehicle to terminate or disconnect
connected vehicle services.
12. Survivor. ''Survivor'' means an individual who is 18 years of age or older and
against whom a covered act has been committed or allegedly committed.
§2263. Protection of survivors
1. Action by covered provider. Regardless of whether an abuser is an account holder,
not later than 2 business days after receiving a connected vehicle service request from a
survivor pursuant to section 2264, a covered provider shall take one or more of the
following actions:
A. Terminate or disable a covered connected vehicle services account associated with
an abuser identified in the connected vehicle service request pursuant to section 2264;
B. Terminate or disable a covered connected vehicle services account associated with
the covered vehicle, including by resetting or deleting any data or wireless connection
with respect to the covered vehicle, and provide instructions to the survivor on how to
reestablish a covered connected vehicle services account that does not include access
by the abuser;
C. Terminate or disable connected vehicle services for the covered vehicle, including
by resetting or deleting any data or wireless connection with respect to the covered
vehicle, and provide instructions to the survivor on how to reestablish connected
vehicle services; or
D. If the covered vehicle has an in-vehicle interface, provide information to the
survivor about the availability of the in-vehicle interface and how to terminate or
disable connected vehicle services using the in-vehicle interface.
2. Access to account data. If a covered provider takes action under subsection 1 in
response to a connected vehicle service request, the covered provider shall deny a request
from the abuser to obtain any data connected to the connected vehicle service maintained
by the covered provider that was generated after the abuser's access to the connected vehicle
service was terminated or disabled following a connected vehicle service request.
3. Limitations on penalties, fees and other requirements. A covered provider may
not make any action undertaken pursuant to subsection 1 contingent on any requirement
other than the requirements under section 2264, including:
Page 2 - 132LR2724(01)

A. Payment of a fee, penalty or other charge;
B. Maintaining or extending the term of a covered connected vehicle services account;
C. Approval of the action by the account holder, if the account holder is not the
survivor; or
D. An increase in the rate charged for the connected vehicle service.
4. Notice to survivor and abuser. The following provisions govern notice to the
survivor and abuser.
A. Before a covered provider provides any formal notice to the abuser regarding any
action undertaken pursuant to subsection 1, the covered provider shall notify the
survivor of the date on which the covered provider intends to give such notice to the
abuser.
B. A covered provider shall take reasonable steps to provide any formal notice to an
abuser as described in paragraph A:
(1) No less than 3 days after the survivor has been notified; and
(2) Only after the abuser's access to the connected vehicle service has been
terminated or disabled.
C. When reviewing a connected vehicle service request, a covered provider shall allow
the survivor to elect the manner in which the covered provider may:
(1) Contact the survivor in response to the connected vehicle service request, if
necessary; or
(2) Notify the survivor of the inability of the covered provider to complete the
connected vehicle service request.
5. Operational or technical infeasibility. The following provisions govern
operational or technical infeasibility of a connected vehicle service request.
A. The requirement to effectuate the requested action in subsection 1 does not apply to
a covered provider if the covered provider cannot operationally or technically
effectuate the connected vehicle service request.
B. If a covered provider cannot operationally or technically effectuate the connected
vehicle service request as described in paragraph A, the covered provider shall:
(1) Promptly notify the survivor who submitted the connected vehicle service
request of that infeasibility; and
(2) Provide the survivor with information about whether the operational or
technical infeasibility can be remedied and, if so, any steps the survivor can take
to assist in remedying the infeasibility.
§2264. Connected vehicle service requests
1. Information provided by survivor. When making a connected vehicle service
request under this chapter, the survivor shall provide:
A. The vehicle identification number of the covered vehicle;
B. The name of the abuser subject to the connected vehicle service request; and
Page 3 - 132LR2724(01)

C. One of the following:
(1) Proof of sole ownership of the covered vehicle;
(2) In the case of a covered vehicle that is not solely owned by the survivor, proof
of exclusive legal possession of the covered vehicle, which may take the form of a
court order awarding possession of the covered vehicle to the survivor; or
(3) In the case of a covered vehicle that is owned in whole or in part by the abuser,
a dissolution decree, temporary order or domestic violence restraining order
naming the abuser and granting possession of the covered vehicle to the survivor
or restricting the abuser's use of a connected vehicle service against the survivor.
2. Confidential and secure treatment of information. The following provisions
govern the confidential and secure treatment of information related to a connected vehicle
service request.
A. A covered provider and any officer, director, employee, vendor or agent of a covered
provider shall treat any information submitted by a survivor under subsection 1 as
confidential and securely dispose of the information no later than 90 days after
receiving the information.
B. A covered provider may not share information submitted by a survivor under
subsection 1 with any 3rd party without the affirmative consent of the survivor unless
such sharing is required to effectuate a connected vehicle service request under
subsection 1.
C. A covered provider may not require a survivor to provide any information other than
what is required in subsection 1 to establish the ability to terminate an abuser's access
to a connected vehicle service.
D. Paragraph A may not be construed to prohibit a covered provider from maintaining,
for longer than the period specified in that paragraph, a record that verifies that a
survivor fulfilled the conditions of a connected vehicle service request under
subsection 1. The data maintained under this paragraph is limited to data that is
reasonably necessary and proportionate to verify that a survivor fulfilled the conditions
of a connected vehicle service request.
3. Emergency situations. The requirements of this chapter do not prohibit or prevent
a covered provider from terminating or disabling an abuser's access to a connected vehicle
service in an emergency situation after receiving a connected vehicle service request.
4. Changes in ownership or possession. The survivor shall take reasonable steps to
notify the covered provider of any change in ownership or possession from what was
provided under subsection 1 when the connected vehicle service request was made that
materially impacts the need for action taken by the covered provider under section 2263,
subsection 1.
§2265. Consumer notices
A covered provider shall provide information to consumers about how survivors can
safely make connected vehicle service requests on a publicly accessible website maintained
by the covered provider. This information provided to consumers must include information
regarding the following.
Page 4 - 132LR2724(01)

1. Confirmation e-mail. Upon submission of a connected vehicle service request, the
covered provider shall automatically send a confirmation e-mail to the survivor
acknowledging the receipt of the connected vehicle service request. This e-mail must
contain a reference number for the connected vehicle service request and an outline of the
subsequent steps in the process.
2. Action; notice. Upon completion of review of the connected vehicle service request,
the covered provider shall inform the survivor by notice of the action taken, including the
termination or disabling of access to the connected vehicle service, or if additional
information is needed. This notice must clearly state any relevant details or further actions
required from the survivor.
3. Explanation and assistance. When a connected vehicle service request is approved,
the covered provider shall provide the survivor with a clear explanation and guidance on
how to create the survivor's own covered connected vehicle services account, if necessary,
to ensure that the survivor can maintain control over the connected vehicle service once the
abuser's access to the service has been terminated or disabled.
4. Opt-out measures. When an abuser still has access to a survivor's e-mail account,
the covered provider shall provide the option to opt out of receiving notices regarding the
connected vehicle service request process and, to the best of the covered provider's ability,
provide alternative options for the survivor to maintain a record of the connected vehicle
service request process.
§2266. Liability protection
A covered provider and any officer, director, employee, vendor or agent of a covered
provider is not subject to liability for any claims deriving from an action taken or omission
made with respect to compliance with this chapter.